Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.115

Washington college savings program—Refunds.

The intent of the Washington college savings program is to make distributions from individual college savings program accounts for beneficiaries' attendance at public or private institutions of higher education. Federal penalties and taxes associated with 529 savings plan refunds may apply to any refund issued by the Washington college savings plan. Refunds shall be issued under specific conditions that may include the following:

(1) Certification that the beneficiary, who is eighteen years of age or older, will not attend a public or private institution of higher education, will result in a refund not to exceed the current value at the time of such certification. The refund shall be made no sooner than ninety days after such certification, less any administrative processing fees assessed by the governing body;

(2) If there is certification of the death or disability of the beneficiary, the refund shall be equal to one hundred percent of the current value at the time that such certification is submitted to the governing body, less any administrative processing fees assessed by the governing body;

(3) If there is certification by the student of graduation or program completion, the refund shall be as great as one hundred percent of the current value at the time that such certification is submitted to the governing body, less any administrative processing fees assessed by the governing body. The governing body may, at its discretion, impose a penalty if needed to comply with federal tax rules;

(4) If there is certification of other tuition and fee scholarships that will cover the cost of tuition for the eligible beneficiary, the refund may not exceed the value of the scholarship or scholarships, less any administrative processing fees assessed by the governing body;

(5) Incorrect or misleading information provided by the purchaser or beneficiaries may result in a refund of the purchaser's and contributors' contributions, less any administrative processing fees assessed by the governing body. The value of the refund must not exceed the actual dollar value of the purchaser's or contributors' contributions; and

(6) The governing body may determine other circumstances qualifying for refunds of remaining unused participant Washington college savings program account balances and may determine the value of that refund.

[ 2016 c 69 s 15.]